New York, session 2025-2026, S8508.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1266-n to read as follows: 3 § 1266-n. Family fare ticket policy. The authority shall develop and 4 implement a family fare ticket policy valid for discounted fares for 5 minors aged twelve through seventeen for any of the authority facilities 6 and systems as defined in subdivision two of section twelve hundred 7 sixty-one of this title. The presence of a parent or guardian is not a 8 prerequisite to receiving the family fare ticket price. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09555-01-5